Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 56
PUBLIC SECURITIES REFUNDING ACT

Section

11-56-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Public Securities Refunding Act".

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 582, § 1, effective July 1.

11-56-102. Legislative declaration - applicability.

The general assembly hereby declares that the orderly refunding of any revenue obligation or any general obligation bond and any other lawful general obligation indebtedness by any public body of the state, as defined in section 11-56-103 (7), when advantageous to the public body or persons within the public body, will serve a public use and will promote the health, safety, security, and general welfare of the inhabitants thereof and of the people of the state of Colorado. It is the intent of this article to provide a consistent mechanism for refunding for such public bodies of the state.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 582, § 1, effective July 1.

11-56-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Escrow supplement" means any funds or moneys (other than bond proceeds) of a public body, legally available for the purpose, which are placed in an escrow or trust account established under the provisions of this article to be used and expended, together with the proceeds of refunding bonds or special obligation refunding bonds, or both, to accomplish the purposes of such escrow or trust account.

Repealed.

"General obligation" means general obligation bonds or any other lawful general obligation of a public body constituting a debt or indebtedness of such public body.

"Governing body" means a city council, board of trustees, commission, board of county commissioners, board of directors, or other legislative body of a public body in which the legislative powers of such public body are vested.

"Net effective interest rate" of a proposed issue of refunding bonds means the net interest cost of said refunding issue divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amounts expressed in one thousand dollar units of such refunding issue maturing on each maturity date by ten times the number of years from the date of said proposed refunding bonds to their respective maturities.

"Net effective interest rate" of outstanding obligations to be refunded means the net interest cost of said obligations to be refunded divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amounts expressed in one thousand dollar units of such obligations to be refunded maturing on each maturity date by ten times the number of years from the date of the proposed refunding bonds to the respective maturities of the obligations to be refunded. In all cases the net effective interest rate shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the obligations to be refunded.

"Net interest cost" of a proposed issue of refunding bonds means the total amount of interest to accrue on said refunding bonds from their date to their respective maturities, less the amount of any premium above par or plus the amount of any discount below par, at which said refunding bonds are being or have been sold.

"Net interest cost" of outstanding obligations to be refunded means the total amount of interest which would accrue on said outstanding obligations from the date of the proposed refunding bonds to the respective maturity dates of said outstanding obligations to be refunded. In all cases the net interest cost shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the obligations to be refunded.

"Public body" means the transportation commission; any state educational institution, or other state institution, its board of regents, or other governing body thereof constituting a body corporate; any county; any municipality as defined by section 31-1-101 (6), C.R.S.; any school district; any special district, including any local government agency, corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other entity, organized or acting pursuant to the provisions of title 32 (except article 8), C.R.S.; and any water conservancy district, city housing authority, county housing authority, urban renewal agency, community redevelopment agency, any other corporate district, any other corporate authority, any corporate commission, or any other political subdivision of this state constituting a body corporate.

"Revenue obligation" means revenue bonds or any other obligation payable solely from and pledging only specified income or revenue of the public body, which bonds or obligations do not constitute a debt or indebtedness of such public body.

"Special obligation refunding bonds" means bonds issued by the public body pursuant to section 11-56-112.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 582, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(7) amended, p. 1611, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(2) repealed, p. 1135, § 85, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(7) amended, p. 1057, § 10, effective July 1.

11-56-104. Purpose of refunding.

A refunding of outstanding obligations of a public body may be accomplished pursuant to this article by the issuance of bonds for refunding, paying, and discharging all or any part of such outstanding obligations, including a portion of one or more issues of such obligations and including any interest thereon in arrears or about to become due, and for one or more of the following purposes:

Avoiding or terminating any default in the payment of interest on or principal of, or both interest on and principal of, said obligations;

Reducing the net effective interest rate of said obligations;

Reducing total interest payable over the life of the obligations, by issuing bonds of a shorter term, or at a lower net interest cost, or having a lower net effective interest rate;

Reducing the total principal and interest payable on such obligations or the principal and interest payable thereon in any particular year or years, or affecting other economies;

Modifying or eliminating restrictive contractual limitations appertaining to such obligations, to the incurring of additional indebtedness or obligations, or to any system, facility, or improvement appertaining thereto;

Postponing the maturity of all or any part or portion of said obligations to a later date, subject to the limitations in section 11-56-107;

Substituting an issue of bonds for a note or notes, or other obligations, including but not limited to any obligation issued in anticipation of the later issuance of bonds;

Any combination of the foregoing purposes specified in this subsection (1).

In making the computations necessary or appropriate pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for a refunding transaction in which all or any portion of the principal of or interest on the refunding bonds is to be paid from the proceeds of such refunding bonds or the interest or other income to be derived from the investment of such proceeds, including any refunding transaction as a part of which special obligation refunding bonds are to be issued, only those amounts with regard to bonds issued for refunding purposes which are to be payable by the public body from sources other than refunding bond proceeds and the interest and other income derived from the investment of such proceeds need to be considered.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 584, § 1, effective July 1.

11-56-104.5. Disclosures by underwriters of financial matters related to refunding.

Whenever an underwriter proposes to refund the bonds of any public body, and competitive proposals have not been requested, the underwriter shall, simultaneously with the submission of the proposal, disclose, in writing, to the governing body of the public body, the entire income, from all sources, which he anticipates receiving if his proposal is accepted, specifying all such sources and amounts, as well as disclosing all expenses which he anticipates the public body will incur as a part of such refunding transaction. Any governing body may require such disclosure whenever any refunding proposals are to be considered.

The underwriter shall also provide the governing body of the public body with a comparison of annual debt service requirements before and after refunding, by year and amount, including funds which are required in addition to bond proceeds. Such comparison shall also show the present value of all annual differences in debt service requirements, using as a discount factor the net effective interest rate of the refunding bonds. All such figures shall be computed from the date on which the transaction is closed and shall include funds provided by the issuer as a reduction of, or an addition to, debt service requirements. Funds provided by the issuer in excess of accrued principal and interest, and earnings on the funds, over the life of, and compounded at the net effective interest rate of, the refunding bonds, shall also be disclosed.

The information specified in subsection (1) of this section shall be updated to the date of closing at the time of closing. Any governing body may require an additional disclosure at such time as final figures are available.

Source:

L. 78:

Entire section added, p. 304, § 1, effective March 29.

11-56-105. General provisions - limitations.

Any revenue obligations or general obligations issued or incurred by any public body may be refunded without an election by the public body issuing or incurring the same or any successor thereof, except as otherwise provided by this section, in the name of the public body which issued or incurred the obligation or indebtedness being refunded, but subject to provisions concerning their payment and to any other contractual limitations in the proceedings authorizing their issuance or otherwise appertaining thereto.

The bonded indebtedness of any school district outstanding at the time of the inclusion of all such district's territory in another district by reorganization, consolidation, dissolution, or any other lawful means may be refunded by action of the governing body of the district, including such territory at the time of such refunding, whether or not such indebtedness has been assumed by the district including such territory.

When an entire school district having outstanding bonded indebtedness has been divided and parts thereof included within two or more other districts by any lawful means, the refunding of such indebtedness shall require affirmative action by a majority of the members of the governing body of each of the districts within which any part of the territory of such district owing said indebtedness is then included, except as is provided in this article to the contrary.

The bonded indebtedness of any school district outstanding at the time any territory of said district is detached therefrom by any lawful means, and which district has retained its lawful corporate existence subsequent to the detachment of such territory from said district, may be refunded by action of the governing body of such district from which territory has been detached with or without concurrence or action by the governing body of any district within which all or any part of said detached territory is included, and such districts from which territory has been detached and which retain their corporate existence subsequent to detachment are specifically exempted from the requirements and provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection (2).

General obligation refunding bonds may be issued to refund all or any portion of one or more outstanding general obligations of a public body, but no two or more outstanding general obligations, or portions thereof, may be refunded by a single issue of refunding bonds unless the taxable property upon which tax levies are being made for payment of each such outstanding general obligation is identical to the taxable property on which such levies are being made for the payment of all other outstanding general obligations proposed to be refunded by such single issue of refunding bonds, and the same tax and debt limitations, if any, applicable to each obligation proposed to be refunded by such single issue of refunding bonds are also applicable to all other obligations to be refunded by such single issue.

Refunding revenue bonds may be issued to refund all or any portion of one or more outstanding revenue obligations, but no two or more outstanding revenue obligations may be refunded by a single issue of refunding revenue bonds unless all of the outstanding revenue obligations could be issued as a single obligation at the time of the refunding. Subject to the provisions and limitations of section 11-56-106, general obligation refunding bonds may be issued to refund all or any portion of one or more outstanding revenue obligations, but no two or more outstanding revenue obligations may be refunded by a single issue of general obligation refunding bonds unless the property subject to taxation for the purpose for which each outstanding revenue obligation to be refunded was issued is identical to the property subject to taxation for the purpose for which each other outstanding revenue obligation to be refunded with such single issue of refunding revenue bonds was issued, and the tax and debt limitations, if any, applicable to taxes levied for general obligations issued for all of the purposes for which the outstanding revenue obligations to be refunded with such single issue of general obligation bonds were issued are the same.

Refunding bonds may be delivered in exchange for the obligations to be refunded or may be sold in such manner as determined by the governing body in the best interests of the public body and the proceeds of said sale applied as provided in this article. Said bonds may be sold at, above, or below the par value thereof if the price thereof will not result in a net effective interest rate in excess of the maximum net effective interest rate authorized by the governing body.

No revenue obligation or general obligation may be refunded unless the holder thereof voluntarily surrenders the same for exchange or payment or the said obligations either mature or are callable by the issuer for prior redemption under their terms within twenty years from the date of issuance of the refunding bonds, and provision shall have been made in said refunding for paying the obligations being refunded within said period of time.

A public body shall be authorized to utilize an escrow supplement in accomplishing any refunding procedures undertaken pursuant to this article; except where the purpose of the refunding is to accomplish the purposes designated in section 11-56-104 (1)(b), (1)(c), or (1)(d), then:

Where general obligations constituting a debt or indebtedness of the public body are to be refunded, such escrow supplement shall not exceed the aggregate principal and net interest cost of the obligations to be refunded less the aggregate principal and net interest cost of the refunding bonds, other than special obligation refunding bonds;

Where general obligation refunding bonds are proposed to be issued to refund revenue obligations, pursuant to section 11-56-106, no escrow supplement in excess of the amount by which the principal amount of the obligations to be refunded exceeds the principal amount of the refunding bonds, other than special obligation refunding bonds, shall be permitted unless approved as a part of the refunding question submitted to the electors.

Neither the principal of nor the interest on any special obligation refunding bonds issued in conjunction with any other refunding bonds pursuant to this article shall be considered when making any of the computations required by this subsection (6).

The provisions of this subsection (6) shall not apply to the refunding bonds where the indebtedness refunded was incurred pursuant to subsection (3) of section 6 of article XI of the state constitution.

Whenever any school district issues refunding bonds under the provisions of this article, the governing body shall provide for registration of the bonds in the manner provided for other school bonds by section 22-42-121, C.R.S., which registration shall have the same legal effect as specified in section 22-42-121, C.R.S.

Any school district which issues refunding bonds under the provisions of this article shall file a report within sixty days after the issuance of said bonds with the state board of education. The report shall indicate the principal amount of obligations refunded, the net effective interest rate of both the obligations refunded and the refunding bonds, the net interest cost of both the obligations refunded and the refunding bonds, all school district costs incident to the issuance of refunding bonds, including those of the escrow agent, and such other items as may be determined by the state board of education.

The issuance of refunding bonds by any public body for purposes of and in the manner authorized by this article, or by the provisions of any other law shall not be interpreted to be the creation of debt or indebtedness such that the same would require the approval at an election in accordance with the constitution or laws of this state, and no such approval shall be required for the issuance of such refunding bonds, except as specifically provided by this article. Any obligations which have been refunded, as provided in this article, either by immediate payment or redemption and retirement or by the placement of proceeds of refunding bonds in escrow, shall not be deemed outstanding for purposes of determining compliance with debt limitations or for determination of the relative position of the pledge or lien on any fund or moneys held by the refunding bonds from and after the date on which sufficient moneys are placed either with the paying agent of such outstanding obligations for the purpose of immediately paying or redeeming and retiring such bonds or with the escrow agent for the purpose of paying or redeeming and retiring such bonds at a designated future date. Sufficiency of any moneys for said purposes shall be determined as provided in section 11-56-109.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 584, § 1, effective July 1.

11-56-106. Refunding with bonds of another type.

Subject to the provisions of subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, nothing contained in this article shall be construed as authorizing a public body to issue any obligations constituting a debt or indebtedness for the purpose of refunding obligations which do not constitute debt or indebtedness.

Any revenue obligations of a public body may be refunded by the issuance of general obligation refunding bonds only if the public body would be authorized by law to issue general obligations for the purposes for which such revenue obligations were originally issued at the time of the issuance of said refunding bonds, whether or not the public body was so authorized at the time of the issuance of such revenue obligations.

If the issuance of general obligations for a particular purpose would be conditioned upon their approval by the qualified electors of the public body at an election, any general obligation refunding bonds proposed to be issued to refund revenue obligations originally issued for such purpose may be issued only if issuance of the refunding bonds has been approved at an election in the same manner.

If a debt limitation pertains to general obligation bonds or other general obligations of a public body issued for a particular purpose, then no general obligation bonds shall be issued to refund any revenue obligations issued for such purpose in any principal amount which would cause such debt limitation to be exceeded.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 587, § 1, effective July 1.

11-56-107. Bond provisions.

The sum of the principal amount of any refunding revenue bonds may exceed the principal amount of the revenue obligations to be refunded thereby by such amount as is useful to effect the refunding if the sum of the aggregate principal and net interest cost of the refunding revenue bonds for the period ending on the scheduled final maturity date of the revenue obligations to be refunded, without regard to any redemptions that may be made prior to such scheduled maturity date, is the same or less than the aggregate principal and net interest cost of the revenue obligations to be refunded for the same time period, excluding from the computation of the aggregate principal and net interest cost of the refunding revenue bonds any interest on the obligations to be refunded in arrears or about to become due and payable which is capitalized with the proceeds of the refunding revenue bonds and any interest on the refunding revenue bonds which is capitalized with the proceeds of the refunding revenue bonds. The principal amount of any general obligation refunding bonds shall not exceed the original authorized principal amount of the general obligations to be refunded. Except for refunding bonds where the indebtedness refunded was incurred pursuant to subsection (3) of section 6 of article XI of the state constitution, the principal amount of any general obligation bonds issued to refund outstanding revenue obligations shall not exceed the outstanding principal amount of the revenue obligations to be refunded, except to the extent that a larger principal amount of refunding bonds is authorized at an election pursuant to section 11-56-106 (3) or in the manner otherwise provided by law for incurring new indebtedness.

Neither the principal of nor the interest on any special obligation refunding bonds issued in conjunction with any other refunding bonds pursuant to this article shall be considered when making any of the computations required by subsection (1) of this section.

The principal amount of the refunding bonds may also be less than or the same as the principal amount of the obligations being refunded, so long as provision is duly and sufficiently made for payment in full and discharge of such refunded obligations.

As the governing body may determine, any refunding bonds issued under this article shall:

Be of a convenient denomination;

Mature at such time not exceeding forty years from the date of said bonds as determined by the governing body;

Bear interest, which may be evidenced by one or more sets of coupons, at a specified rate, payable annually or semiannually, but the first interest payment may be for interest accruing for any other period not to exceed three years;

Be made payable, both principal and interest, in lawful money of the United States, at such place as determined by the governing body;

Be negotiable in form and executed in substantially the same manner as prescribed for other bonds of such public body.

The right to redeem all or part of said refunding bonds prior to their maturity, and the order of any such redemption, may be reserved in the ordinance or resolution of the governing body, as the case may be, authorizing the issuance of the bonds and, if so reserved, shall be set forth on the face of said bonds. Such redemption may be with or without the payment of a premium not exceeding five percent of principal, as determined by the governing body.

Any ordinance or resolution authorizing, or any escrow agreement or trust indenture or other instrument appertaining to, any refunding bonds issued under this article may provide that each refunding bond shall recite that it is issued under authority of this article. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all of the provisions and limitations of this article, and all refunding bonds issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 587, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 507, § 1, effective April 22.

11-56-108. Application of bond proceeds - procedures - limitations.

The proceeds derived from the issuance of refunding bonds under the provisions of this article, together with other legally available funds, if any, of the public body, shall either be immediately applied to the payment or redemption and retirement of the obligations to be refunded and the cost and expense incident to such procedures or shall be placed in escrow or trust to be applied for the purposes and in the manner required or permitted under this article as the governing body may determine.

Proceeds of refunding bonds, including proceeds of special obligation refunding bonds, if any, and other moneys which are placed in escrow or trust, pursuant to the determination and direction of the governing body, shall be used and applied for the following purposes and in the following manner, the details of which shall be set forth in full and at length in the escrow agreement:

For the purpose of paying the principal of, interest on, and prior redemption premiums, if any, for the obligations refunded only;

For the purpose of paying all or specified portions of the principal of, interest on, and prior redemption premiums, if any, for the obligations to be refunded or the refunding bonds or any combination thereof;

For the purpose of paying all of the principal of, interest on, and prior redemption premiums, if any, for the obligations refunded, and all of the principal of, interest on, and prior redemption premiums, if any, for all special obligation refunding bonds issued as a part of the refunding transaction;

In specified portions, for one or more or all of the purposes described in this subsection (2).

The escrow agreement shall in each case designate and set forth with regard to the obligations refunded, the refunding bonds, and the special obligation refunding bonds, if any:

Any amounts of principal, interest, prior redemption premiums, and costs and expenses of the refunding transaction to be payable from the escrow or trust account; including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the capitalization of interest on the refunding bonds for such period of time as the governing body may determine;

Whether each such amount is to be payable:

From funds originally placed in such escrow or trust account; or

From the interest or other income derived from the investment of the funds originally placed in such escrow or trust account; or

From a specified combination of subparagraphs (I) and (II) of this paragraph (b), and, if so, in what proportions; or

From any moneys in such account without specification or restriction; and

The order and priority, if any, which is to govern the use and application of all or any part of the funds held in said escrow or trust account to payment of any such amounts.

The incidental costs and expenses of the refunding transaction may be paid by the purchaser of the refunding bonds, or by the public body from any general fund, subject to appropriations therefor and any other limitations on the use thereof as otherwise provided by law, or from other available revenues of the public body under the control of the governing body, or from the proceeds of the refunding bonds, or from the interest or other yield derived from the investment of any refunding bond proceeds or other moneys placed in the escrow or trust, or from any other sources legally available therefor, or any combination thereof, as the governing body may determine.

Any accrued interest and any premium appertaining to a sale of refunding bonds may be applied to the payment of the interest thereon or the principal thereof, or to both interest and principal, or may be deposited in a reserve therefor, or may be used to pay refunded obligations by deposit in the escrow or trust account, or otherwise, or may be used to defray any incidental costs and expenses appertaining to the refunding, or any combination thereof, as the governing body may determine. In the event of any use of such accrued interest or premium other than for payment of interest on or principal of the refunding bonds, or as a reserve therefor, the net interest cost figures on the refunding bonds used in making the computations required in sections 11-56-105 (6) and 11-56-107 (1) shall be adjusted upward accordingly to reflect the amounts actually to be paid by the public body.

For the purpose of implementing the provisions of this article, the governing body shall have the power to enter into escrow agreements and to establish escrow or trust accounts with any commercial bank having full trust powers located within the state of Colorado and which is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation under protective covenants and agreements whereby such accounts shall be fully secured as provided by section 11-56-109.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 589, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(3)(a) amended, p. 508, § 2, effective April 22.

11-56-109. Proceeds of refunding bonds in escrow - investment - security - amounts.

Moneys placed in any escrow or trust shall not necessarily be limited to proceeds of refunding bonds but may include other moneys legally available for the purpose.

Any moneys in escrow or trust, pending use for their intended purpose, may be invested or reinvested only in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.

The escrow agent shall continuously secure any moneys placed in escrow or trust and not so invested or reinvested in securities by a pledge of such securities in a principal amount at all times at least equal to the total uninvested moneys held in such escrow or trust in strict accordance with the provisions of the escrow agreement. The requirements of this subsection (3) shall not apply with regard to any such uninvested moneys to the extent and during any time the same are fully insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation.

Such moneys and investments in the escrow or trust account, together with the interest or other gain to be derived from any such investments, shall at all times be at least sufficient to make all of the payments required to be made pursuant to the escrow agreement in the manner and at the times specified in said agreement.

The computations made in determining such sufficiency shall be verified by a certified public accountant licensed to practice in this state.

No purchaser of any refunding bond issued under this article shall be responsible in any manner for the application of the bond proceeds or other moneys by the public body, the governing body, or any of the officers, agents, or employees of the public body.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 590, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1106, § 7, effective July 1.

11-56-110. Sources of payment - limitations.

Refunding bonds, other than special obligation refunding bonds, may be made payable from, and the governing body may pledge to the payment of such refunding bonds, any tax, or any income or revenue of the public body from any source, or both such taxes and such income or revenue, which could have been legally pledged to and used for the payment of the obligations being refunded at the time such obligations being refunded were issued or which could legally be pledged to and used for the payment of the obligations being refunded if the same were to be issued at the time of the refunding, as the governing body may determine, notwithstanding the pledge of such taxes, income or revenue for the payment of the outstanding obligations being refunded is thereby modified. In no event, however, shall any taxes, income, or revenues be pledged for the payment of any refunding bonds which could not have been lawfully pledged for the payment of the obligations being refunded because of the lack of the required approval of such pledge by the electors qualified to vote on the issuance of the obligations being refunded, or because of limitations in the election question authorizing their issuance, unless the refunding bonds and such pledge are similarly authorized by the electors at an election in substantially the manner required by law for the issuance of the obligations being refunded.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 591, § 1, effective July 1.

11-56-111. Combination of refunding bonds and other bonds - limitations.

Any refunding bonds and bonds for any other purpose authorized by any other law may, in the discretion of the governing body, be issued separately or in combination in one or more series by the public body, subject, however, to the same limitations provided in section 11-56-105 (3) for combined refunding of two or more outstanding obligations.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 591, § 1, effective July 1.

11-56-112. Special obligation refunding bonds.

In addition to and in combination with the refunding bonds authorized by this article, the public body may concurrently issue special obligation refunding bonds, for the purpose of providing additional funds with which to accomplish the refunding of outstanding general obligations or outstanding revenue obligations. Such special obligation refunding bonds shall be payable solely from amounts pledged under the escrow or trust agreement derived from certain specified interest or principal, or both interest and principal, payments on the investments in said escrow or trust account.

The total principal amount of special obligation refunding bonds shall not exceed the sum of the following items reduced by the total principal amount of refunding bonds, other than special obligation refunding bonds, to be issued as a part of such refunding transaction:

The total outstanding principal amount of the obligations being refunded;

The prior redemption premium, if any, payable on that portion of the obligations being refunded which are to be called for redemption prior to maturity, as set forth in the ordinance or resolution authorizing the refunding bonds;

The total accrued and unaccrued interest payable on the obligations refunded to stated maturity dates or to the dates at which all or specified portions of the refunded obligations are to be called for redemption prior to maturity, as set forth in the ordinance or resolution authorizing the refunding bonds, less the amount of any such accrued interest deposited into the escrow account by the issuer; and

All costs incurred in the authorization, sale, issuance, and delivery of the refunding bonds and the special obligation refunding bonds.

The public body shall have no authority or power, at any time or in any manner, to pledge its credit, or its taxing power or any other funds, moneys, income, or revenues of such public body other than as specified in this section, to the payment of the principal of or interest on the special obligation refunding bonds issued pursuant to this section, nor shall such special obligation refunding bonds be deemed to be a debt or indebtedness of the public body or the state of Colorado, and such condition shall be set forth on the face of the bonds; except that such public body may pledge any other taxing power, funds, moneys, income, or revenues of such public body as additional security for the special obligation refunding bonds.

The general provisions of this article relating to refunding obligations shall equally apply to special obligation refunding bonds, except as otherwise provided in this article.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 591, § 1, effective July 1.

11-56-113. Tax exemption - exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, all general obligation refunding bonds, refunding revenue bonds, and special obligation refunding bonds and the income therefrom shall be exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

Bonds issued pursuant to this article for the purpose of refunding outstanding obligations which were neither exempt from such taxation at the time issued or at the time of the refunding nor which would have been exempt from such taxation if originally issued at the time of the refunding, shall be subject to taxation to the same extent and in the same manner as the outstanding obligations for the refunding of which they are issued.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 592, § 1, effective July 1.

11-56-114. Conclusive determination of governing body that statutory limitations have been met.

The determination of the governing body that the provisions and limitations, in this article and any other applicable law, imposed upon the issuance of any bonds under this article, have been met shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud or arbitrary and gross abuse of discretion.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 592, § 1, effective July 1.

11-56-115. Prior obligations not impaired.

Nothing in this article shall be construed in any manner so as to impair the obligations of any refunding bonds issued or any refunding transaction, consummated by a public body prior to the enactment of this article, or otherwise to invalidate any such bond, obligation, or refunding transaction.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 592, § 1, effective July 1.

11-56-116. Construction of this article.

The powers conferred by this article are in addition and supplemental to and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this article shall not directly or indirectly modify, limit, or affect, the powers conferred by any other law. Bonds may be issued under this article without regard to the provisions of any other law, and if so issued, insofar as the provisions of this article are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this article shall be controlling.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 592, § 1, effective July 1.

11-56-117. Liberal construction.

This article shall be liberally construed so that the legislative intent may be fulfilled.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 593, § 1, effective July 1.